src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON DIEHTEMAHTES !!= @CODE@ ! odd syllable For hardcoded -ahtes words. Derived from odd-syll NomAct (Bårråt>bårråm-bårråmahtes), or from odd-syll verbs as buorránit>buorránahtes. Migth want to split lexicon in two.
                           :ahtes%>     ATTR              ;
!        +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:ahtá%>      K-VOW            ; !- ahtá is not adverb, according to Bruce Morén-Duolljá its a case like essive.
!        +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:ahti%>      K-VOW            ;
                    +Sg+Nom:ahtes%>     K-CONS            ;
           +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:ahttá%>     PxV               ; !
                +Ess+Use/NG:ahttá%>n    K-CONS            ;
!                          :ahtes       VUOHTA            ; !moved to ATTR
                           :ahttá%>     ILL-EVENCASEadj   ;
                    +Use/NG:ahttá%>     N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ;
                 +Cmp/SgGen:ahttá%>     R                 ;     
                 +Cmp/PlGen:ahttá%>j    R                 ;
!                          :ahttá%>     BU/MUS            ; !Outcommendted Der/Comp and Der/Super 19.96.2020, gives very strange meaning
                           :ahttás%>    OTH-ODDCASEadj    ;
!                          :ahttás%>    ABBO/AMOS         ; !Outcommendted Der/Comp and Der/Super 19.96.2020, gives very strange meaning
         +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:ahttás%>it  K-CONS            ;
                           :ahttás%>    ODDCmp            ;


LEXICON LÁGÁSJ !!= @CODE@
      +Attr:%>   K-CONS         ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:%>a  R              ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:%>ij R              ;
           :     VUOHTA         ;
           :%>   N-ODDCASE      ;
           :%>   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
   -+Use/Circ:#%-  ProperNoun     ; ! ! Definitely circular x 35000.

LEXICON BÁJNUK !!= @CODE@ ! hardcoded denominal derivations, latus has changed from o>u, a>a, e>á (Bájnno>bájnuk, juolgge>juolgák, giella>gielak.  Attr same as pred, no comp in this lexicon. 
      +Attr:%>   K-CONS         ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:%>a  R              ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:%>ij R              ;
      +Attr:     VUOHTA         ;
           :%>   N-ODDCASE      ;
           :%>   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;

LEXICON TSÅHPÅK !!= @CODE@ ! hardcoded denominal derivations latus has changed from o>u, a>a, e>á AND -GIS attr. Attr same as pred is err/orth taged. no comp in this lexicon. 

          +Attr:is%>   K-CONS         ;
 +Err/Orth+Attr:%>     K-CONS         ;
     +Cmp/SgGen:%>a    R              ;
     +Cmp/PlGen:%>ij   R              ;
          +Attr:       VUOHTA         ;
               :%>     N-ODDCASE      ;
               :%>     OTH-ODDCASEadj ;

LEXICON GIEVLEK !!= @CODE@ ! hardcoded derivations, not same as BÁJNUK since latus has unexpected vowel. Latus hasn't changed o>u, a>a, e>á. Goes directly to BÁJNUK, only made to sort these different kinds of derivations. Many of these may be derivated from verbs or other adjectives.

: BÁJNUK ; 


LEXICON SJERVAK !!= @CODE@ ! hardcoded derivations, not same as TSÅHPÅK since latus has unexpected vowel. Latus hasn't changed o>u, a>a, e>á. Goes directly to TSÅHPÅK, only made to sort these different kinds of derivations. Many of these may be derivated from verbs or other adjectives.

: TSÅHPÅK ;

LEXICON DIBME !!= @CODE@ ! even and contracted
                   :dibme%>    NE-EVENCASEadj    ;
                   :dibme%>X4  ILL-EVENCASEadj   ;
                   :dibme%>Q1  N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ;
!       +Use/-Spell:d          ABBO/AMOS         ; !Outcommendted Der/Comp and Der/Super 19.96.2020, gives very strange meaning
         +Cmp/SgGen:dibme%>Q1  R                 ;
         +Cmp/PlGen:dibme%>Q1j R                 ;
 +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:dibme%>Q1t K-CONS            ;


LEXICON LIS !!= @CODE@ ! Handlernomen på -is?
                        :%>     ATTR                     ;
                 +Sg+Nom:%>     K-CONS                   ;
        +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:a%>    PxV                      ; !
              +Cmp/SgGen:a%>Q1  R                        ;
              +Cmp/PlGen:a%>Q1j R                        ;
                    +Ess:a%>n   K-CONS                   ;
                        :a%>Q1  N-EVENWEAKSTEM-OTHadj    ;
                        :a%>    ILL-EVENCASEadj          ;
                        :a%>Q1  N-EVENWEAKSTEM-SG-COMadj ;
!                       : VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR


LEXICON Ahkásasj !!= @CODE@ ! lexicalized and denominal -asj derivations
      +Attr:%>     K-CONS        ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:a%>Q1  R             ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:a%>Q1j R             ;
    +Sg+Nom:%>     K-CONS        ;
           :a%>    ÁRMMOGIS-EVEN ;
           :       VUOHTA        ;


LEXICON STÁVVALIS !!= @CODE@ ! Must be "stávvalis" in bot pred and attr, as "guovddelis". OK& Kintel 2012: stávval attr stávvalis this is err/orth taged, also as second compound, this is err/orth taged. No comparison.
                    :is%>      ATTR           ; !
             +Sg+Nom:is%>      K-CONS         ;
                    :issa%>    ÁRMMOGIS-EVEN  ; ! Declined as four-syllable noun
  +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:issa%>Q1t K-CONS         ;
          +Cmp/SgGen:issa%>Q1  R              ;
          +Cmp/PlGen:issa%>Q1j R              ;

 +Err/Orth+Cmp/SgGen:%>a       R              ; !stávval as pred
 +Err/Orth+Cmp/PlGen:%>ij      R              ; !stávval as pred
           +Err/Orth:%>Q1      VUOHTA         ; !stávval as pred
           +Err/Orth:%>        N-ODDCASE      ; !stávval as pred
           +Err/Orth:%>        OTH-ODDCASEadj ; !stávval as pred



!! Derivations to adjectives, continuation lexicon not for hardcoded adjectives




LEXICON AHTES !!= @CODE@ ! odd syllable, only a continuation lexicon for words that are not in adjectives stems. Just as DIEHTEMAHTES, only with the +A tag that adjectives already get i stems file.
                           +A:ahtes%>     ATTR              ;
!        +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:ahtá%>      K-VOW            ; !- ahtá is not adverb, according to Bruce Morén-Duolljá its a case like essive.
!        +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:ahti%>      K-VOW            ;
                    +A+Sg+Nom:ahtes%>     K-CONS            ;
!           +A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:ahttá%>     PxV              ; ! No possesive suffixes
                       +A+Ess:ahttá%>n    K-CONS            ;
!                          +A:ahtes       VUOHTA            ; !moved to ATTR
                           +A:ahttá%>     ILL-EVENCASEadj   ;
                           +A:ahttá%>     N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ;
                 +A+Cmp/SgGen:ahttá%>     R                 ;     
                 +A+Cmp/PlGen:ahttá%>j    R                 ;
!                          +A:ahttá%>     BU/MUS            ; !Outcommendted Der/Comp and Der/Super 19.96.2020, gives very strange meaning
                            +A:ahttás%>   OTH-ODDCASEadj    ;
!                           +A:ahttás%>   ABBO/AMOS         ; !Outcommendted Der/Comp and Der/Super 19.96.2020, gives very strange meaning
          +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:ahttás%>it K-CONS            ;
                            +A:ahttás%>   ODDCmp            ;


LEXICON AHKES !!= @CODE@  
                        +A:%>Q1s ATTR              ;
                 +A+Sg+Nom:%>Q1s K-CONS            ;
                        +A:%>X4  ILL-EVENCASEadj   ;
                        +A:%>X4  N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ;
        +A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%>X4  PxV               ; !
                    +A+Ess:%>X4n K-CONS            ;
                        +A:%>X4  BU/MUS            ;
      +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>X4t K-CONS            ;
              +A+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4  R                 ;
              +A+Cmp/PlGen:%>X4j R                 ;



LEXICON AGAdj !!= @CODE@ ! denominal derivations go here, attr same as pred, no comp in this lexicon
      +A+Attr:%>   K-CONS         ;
 +A+Cmp/SgGen:%>a  R              ;
 +A+Cmp/PlGen:%>ij R              ;
      +A+Attr:     VUOHTA         ;
           +A:%>   N-ODDCASE      ;
           +A:%>   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
