src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
asmelbelak+A+CmpNP/None:asmelbelag9 GIEVLEK ; ! bielle
avtamånek+A:avta#måneg9 GIEVLEK ;
avtasellak+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:avta#sellag9 BÁJNUK ; ! sælla
avtastávvalis+A:avta#stávval STÁVVALIS ;
badjelasj+A+CmpNP/None:badjeladtj Ahkásasj ;
barjok+A:barjog9 SJERVAK ; !barjja
bavlak+A+CmpNP/Last:bavlag9 GIEVLEK ; !Kintel: bavlak. -k der coming from noun bavlle
bellugahtes+A+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:belluk DIEHTEMAHTES ;
buollnadahtes+A:buollnad DIEHTEMAHTES ;
buollnamahtes+A:buollnamm DIEHTEMAHTES ;
buorreluoduk+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:buorre#luodug9 BÁJNUK ; ! luonndo
buorrelágásj+A+CmpNP/None:buorre#lágátj LÁGÁSJ ;
bájnuk+A+Use/NG:bájnog9 GIEVLEK ;
dablak+A:dablag9 SJERVAK ; !dablle
dajvak+A:dajvag9 BÁJNUK ;
deblak+A+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dieblag9 SJERVAK ; !dieblle
diehtemahtes+A:diehtem DIEHTEMAHTES ;
diehtovájnok+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:diehto#vájnog9 SJERVAK ; ! vájnno
diehtovájnuk+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:diehto#vájnug9 TSÅHPÅK ; !! vájnno
dijmásj+A+CmpNP/None:dijmátj LÁGÁSJ ;
dåbmarahtes+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dåbmar DIEHTEMAHTES ;
dålusj+A+CmpNP/None:dålutj LÁGÁSJ ;
dæddostávvalis+A:dæddo^stávval STÁVVALIS ;
gasskasjattuk+A:gasska#sjattug9 BÁJNUK ; !sjaddo
gavvarisnjunják+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gavvaris#njunjág9 TSÅHPÅK ; ! njunnje
geduk+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gedug9 TSÅHPÅK ; !giehto
geŋgalágásj+A+CmpNP/None:geŋgalágátj LÁGÁSJ ;
giehtabelak+A+CmpNP/None:giehta#belag9 GIEVLEK ; ! bielle
guhkarájak+A+CmpNP/None:guhka#rájag9 GIEVLEK ; !rádje
guhkavuoptak+A+CmpNP/None:guhka#vuoptag9 BÁJNUK ; !vuoppta
gullogahtes+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gullog DIEHTEMAHTES ;
guovtegávnak+A+CmpNP/None:guovte#gávnag9 SJERVAK ; ! gávnne
guovtemuoduk+A+CmpNP/None:guovte#muodug9 TSÅHPÅK ; !muohto
guovtestávvalis+A:guovte#stávval STÁVVALIS ;
guovtesuorak+A+CmpNP/None:guovte#suorag9 SJERVAK ; !suorre
gájkkalágásj+A+CmpNP/None:gájkkalágátj LÁGÁSJ ;
gájmarmielak+A+CmpNP/None:gájmar#mielag9 BÁJNUK ; !miella
gålmågerdak+A+CmpNP/None:gålmå#gerdag9 GIEVLEK ; !gierdde
iemelágásj+A+CmpNP/None:ieme#lágátj LÁGÁSJ ;
iesjgeŋgalágásj+A+Err/Orth+CmpNP/None:iesj#gengalágátj LÁGÁSJ ;
iesjmuoduk+A+CmpNP/None:iesj#muodug9 TSÅHPÅK ; ! muohto
ietjálágásj+A+CmpNP/None:ietjá#lágátj LÁGÁSJ ;
ieŋŋilsgielak+A+CmpNP/None+Sem/Hum:ieŋŋils#gielag9 BÁJNUK ; ! giella
jubmelahtes+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jubmel DIEHTEMAHTES ;
juogalágásj+A+CmpNP/None:juoga#lágátj LÁGÁSJ ;
juoŋgamuoduk+A+CmpNP/None:juoŋga#muodug9 TSÅHPÅK ; !muohto
jåduk+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jådug9 TSÅHPÅK ; !jåhto
jålek+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jåleg9 GIEVLEK ;
leruk+A+CmpNP/Last:lerug9 BÁJNUK ; ! lærro
lágásj+A+CmpNP/Last:lágátj LÁGÁSJ ;
moattestávvalis+A:moatte#stávval STÁVVALIS ;
muoduk+A+CmpNP/Last:muodug9 TSÅHPÅK ; !muohto
mårak+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:mårag9 GIEVLEK ;
namák+A+CmpNP/Last:namág9 BÁJNUK ; ! namma
ninnjelissjervak+A:ninnjelis#sjervag9 SJERVAK ;
oahppamahtes+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:oahppam DIEHTEMAHTES ;
rabdak+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:rabdag9 TSÅHPÅK ; !rabdda
rievtugahtes+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:rievtug DIEHTEMAHTES ;
råntsak+A:råntsag9 GIEVLEK ; !rånntse
råtjek+A:råtjeg9 SJERVAK ;
sierralágásj+A+CmpNP/None:sierralágátj LÁGÁSJ ;
sjattuk+A:sjattug9 BÁJNUK ; !sjaddo
snarrenjunják+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:snarre#njunjág9 TSÅHPÅK ; ! njunnje
snjurtjuk+v3+A:snjurtjug9 SJERVAK ; !snjurttje
stávvalis+A:stávval STÁVVALIS ;
såbadahtes+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:såbad DIEHTEMAHTES ;
sæmmisjervak+A+CmpNP/None:sæmmi#sjervag9 SJERVAK ;
tjoajvák+A+CmpNP/Last+Err/Orth:tjoajvag9 GIEVLEK ; ! tjoajvve oa should become å with a in latus
tjågŋek+A+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjåneg9 SJERVAK ;
tsåhpåk+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tsåhpåg9 TSÅHPÅK ;
ubbmemsámegielak+A+CmpNP/None+Sem/Hum:ubbmem#sáme#gielag9 BÁJNUK ; !giella
umasselágásj+v1+A+CmpNP/None:u#masse#lágátj LÁGÁSJ ; ! ungram
vielldemahtes+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vielldem DIEHTEMAHTES ;
vájnuk+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vájnug9 TSÅHPÅK ; ! vájnno
várrogahtes+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:várrog DIEHTEMAHTES ;
ánssidahtes+A:ánssid DIEHTEMAHTES ;
árbbedábak+A+CmpNP/None:árbbe#dábag9 GIEVLEK ; !dáhpe
árvuk+A+CmpNP/Last:árvug9 BÁJNUK ; ! árvvo
ållessjervak+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ållessjervag9 SJERVAK ;
dakkárlágásj+A+CmpNP/None:dakkár#lágátj LÁGÁSJ ;
